North Carolina statutes. Chapter 10B. Notaries.
Part 2. Registration.

§ 10B-105.
Qualifications.

A person qualified for electronic notary registration shall meet all of the following requirements:

Hold a valid commission as a notary public in the State of North Carolina.

Except as otherwise provided, abide by all the provisions of Article 1 of this Chapter.

Satisfy the requirements of

G.S. 10B-107

.

Submit an electronic registration form containing no significant misstatement or omission of fact.

The Secretary may deny a registration as an electronic notary as authorized in

G.S. 10B-5(d)

.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-106.
Registration with the Secretary of State.

Before performing notarial acts electronically, a notary shall register the capability to notarize electronically with the Secretary.

The term of registration as an electronic notary shall coincide with the term of the notary’s commission under Article 1 of this Chapter.

An electronic notary shall reregister the capability to notarize electronically at the same time the notary applies for recommissioning under the requirements of Article 1 of this Chapter.

An electronic form shall be used by an electronic notary in registering with the Secretary and it shall include, at least all of the following:

The applicant’s full legal name and the name to be used for commissioning, excluding nicknames.

The state and county of commissioning of the registrant.

The expiration date of the registrant’s notary commission.

Proof of successful completion of the course of instruction on electronic notarization as required by this Article.

A description of the technology the registrant will use to create an electronic signature in performing official acts.

If the device used to create the registrant’s electronic signature was issued or registered through a licensed certification authority, the name of that authority, the source of the license, the starting and expiration dates of the device’s term of registration, and any revocations, annulments, or other premature terminations of any registered device of the registrant that was due to misuse or compromise of the device, with the date, cause, and nature of each termination explained in detail.

The e-mail address of the registrant.The information provided in a registration that relates to subdivision (7) of this section shall be considered confidential information and shall not be subject to disclosure under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes, except as provided by rule.

The electronic registration form for an electronic notary shall be transmitted electronically to the Secretary and shall include any decrypting instructions, codes, keys, or software that allow the registration to be read.

Within 10 business days after the change of any registration information required of an electronic notary, the notary shall electronically transmit to the Secretary a notice of the change of information signed with the notary’s official electronic signature.

History.

2005-391, s. 4; 2006-59, s. 25; 2006-259, ss. 1, 3.

§ 10B-107.
Course of instruction.

Before performing electronic notarial acts, a notary shall take a course of instruction of least three hours approved by the Secretary and pass an examination of this course, which shall be in addition to the educational requirements provided in Article 1 of this Chapter.

The content of the course and the basis for the examination shall be notarial laws, procedures, technology, and ethics as they pertain to electronic notarization.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-108.
Fees for registration.

The fee payable to the Secretary for registering or reregistering as an electronic notary is fifty dollars ($50.00), which shall be in addition to the fee required in

G.S. 10B-13

. All funds received by the Secretary under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§§ 10B-109 through 10B-114.
[Repealed]

Reserved for future codification purposes.